District of Columbia statutes.
22-3023

Prompt reporting.

Evidence of delay in reporting an offense under subchapter II of this chapter to a public authority shall not raise any presumption concerning the credibility or veracity of a charge under subchapter II of this chapter.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 303, 42 DCR 53

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4123.